Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-437
Infraction; trial without a jury; constitutional rights.

The trial of any person for an infraction shall be by the court without a jury. All other rights provided by the Constitution of the United States made applicable to the states by the Fourteenth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of the State of Nebraska shall apply to persons charged with an infraction.

Laws 1979, LB 534, § 4.